Alaska statutes. Title 12. Code of Criminal Procedure.
Article 2. Child Fatality Review Teams.

Sec. 12.65.120.
State child fatality review team.

The state child fatality review team is established in the Department of Health and Social Services to assist the state medical examiner. The team is composed of

the following persons, or that person’s designee:

the state medical examiner;

a state prosecutor with experience in homicide prosecutions, appointed by the attorney general;

an investigator with the state troopers who has experience in conducting investigations of homicide, child abuse, or child neglect, appointed by the commissioner of public safety;

a social worker with the Department of Health and Social Services who has experience in conducting investigations of child abuse and neglect, appointed by the commissioner of health and social services;

the following persons, or that person’s designee, appointed by the commissioner of health and social services:

a physician licensed under AS 08.64 who

specializes in neonatology or perinatology; or

is certified by the American Board of Pediatrics;

a municipal law enforcement officer with experience in conducting investigations of homicide, child abuse, or child neglect;

other persons, including educators, whose experience and expertise would, as determined by the commissioner of health and social services, contribute to the effectiveness of the team.

A team member is not eligible to receive compensation from the state for service on the team. A member appointed under (a)(2) of this section

is eligible for travel expenses and per diem from the Department of Health and Social Services under AS

39.20.180

; and

serves at the pleasure of the commissioner of health and social services.

In addition to the persons specified in (a) of this section, the team may invite a person to participate as a member of the team if the person has expertise that would be helpful to the team in a review of a specific death. A person participating under this subsection is eligible only for travel expenses and per diem from the Department of Health and Social Services under AS

39.20.180

.

The state medical examiner serves as chair of the team.

History.

(§ 10 ch 99 SLA 1998)

Sec. 12.65.130.
State child fatality review team duties.

The state child fatality review team shall

assist the state medical examiner in determining the cause and manner of the deaths in this state of children under 18 years of age;

unless the child’s death is currently being investigated by a law enforcement agency, review a report of a death of a child within 48 hours of the report being received by the medical examiner if

the death is of a child under 10 years of age;

the deceased child, a sibling, or a member of the deceased child’s household

is in the legal or physical custody of the state under AS 47 or under similar custody of another state or political subdivision of a state; or

has been the subject of a report of harm under AS 47.17 or a child abuse or neglect investigation by the Department of Health and Social Services or by a similar child protective service in this or another state;

a protective order issued, filed, or recognized under AS

18.66.100

,

18.66.110

, or

18.66.140

has been in effect during the previous year in which the petitioner or respondent was a member of the deceased child’s immediate family or household; or

the child’s death occurred in a mental health institution, mental health treatment facility, foster home, or other residential or child care facility, including a day care facility;

review records concerning

abuse or neglect of the deceased child or another child in the deceased child’s household;

the criminal history or juvenile delinquency of a person who may have caused the death of the child and of persons in the deceased child’s household; and

a history of domestic violence involving a person who may have caused the death of the child or involving persons in the deceased child’s household, including records in the central registry of protective orders under AS

18.65.540

;

if insufficient information exists to adequately determine the cause and manner of death, recommend to the state medical examiner that additional information be obtained under AS

12.65.020

; and

if a local, regional, or district child fatality review team has not been appointed under AS

12.65.015

or is not available, be available to provide recommendations, suggestions, and advice to state or municipal law enforcement or social service agencies in the investigation of deaths of children.

The state child fatality review team may

collect data and analyze and interpret information regarding deaths of children in this state;

develop state and local data bases on deaths of children in this state;

develop a model protocol for the investigation of deaths of children; and

periodically issue reports to the public containing statistical data and other information that does not violate federal or state law concerning confidentiality of the children and their families involved in the reviews; these reports may include

identification of trends, patterns, and risk factors in deaths of the children;

analyses of the incidence and causes of deaths of children in this state;

recommendations for improving the coordination of government services and investigations; and

recommendations for prevention of future deaths of children.

History.

(§ 10 ch 99 SLA 1998; am § 15 ch 13 SLA 2017)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2017 amendment, effective September 17, 2017, in (a)(2)(c), inserted “issued, filed, or recognized” following “a protective order” and “, or 18.66.140” preceding “has been in effect”, and made related changes.

Sec. 12.65.140.
Records; information; meetings; confidentiality; immunity.

The state child fatality review team and its members shall have access to all information and records to which the state medical examiner has access under this chapter. The state child fatality review team and its members shall maintain the confidentiality of information and records concerning deaths under review, except when disclosures may be necessary to enable the team to carry out its duties under this chapter. However, the team and its members may not disclose a record that is confidential under federal or state law.

Except for public reports issued by the team, records and other information collected by the team or a member of the team related to duties under this chapter are confidential and not subject to public disclosure under AS

40.25.100

—

40.25.295

(Alaska Public Records Act).

Meetings of the state child fatality review team are closed to the public and are not subject to the provisions of AS

44.62.310

—

44.62.319

(Open Meetings Act).

The determinations, conclusions, and recommendations of the state child fatality review team, or its members, are not admissible in a civil or criminal proceeding. Members may not be compelled to disclose their determinations, conclusions, recommendations, discussions, or thought processes through discovery or testimony in any civil or criminal proceeding. Records and information collected by the state child fatality review team are not subject to discovery or subpoena in connection with a civil or criminal proceeding.

Notwithstanding (d) of this section, the state medical examiner may testify in a civil or criminal proceeding even though the death was reviewed by the state child fatality review team under AS

12.65.130

and information received from the review formed a basis of the state medical examiner’s testimony.

A person who is a member or an employee of, or who furnishes services to or advises, the state child fatality review team is not liable for damages or other relief in an action brought by reason of the performance of a duty, a function, or an activity of the review team.

History.

(§ 10 ch 99 SLA 1998; am § 9 ch 58 SLA 2010)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2000, “AS

40.25.100

—

40.25.220

” was substituted for “AS

09.25.100

—

09.25.220

” to reflect the 2000 renumbering of AS

09.25.100

—

09.25.220

.

In 2010, “AS

44.62.310

—

44.62.319

(Open Meetings Act)” was substituted for “AS

44.62.310

and

44.62.312

” in accordance with § 29(1), ch. 58, SLA 2010.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2010 amendment, effective June 10, 2010, in (b), substituted “AS

40.25.100

—

40.25.295

” for “AS

40.25.100

—

40.25.220

”.